California statutes. Welfare and Institutions Code
(E) Following the first fiscal year of implementation, to the extent state operations funding is needed for continued implementation of this subdivision, and if there is no separate appropriation for administrative purposes, set aside funds from appropriations for the CalWORKs Housing Support Program and Housing and Disability Income Advocacy Program, and, if applicable, future appropriations for the Home Safe Program and Bringing Families Home Program, may be used to implement this subdivision. The total combined amount of these set aside funds to be used for this purpose may not exceed 1 percent of the total combined amount of the appropriated funds for these four programs in a given fiscal year.

(d) (1) The department shall establish criteria for recipients to receive housing-related services and financial assistance pending the resolution of a complaint
 pursuant to subdivision (b) and a state hearing pursuant to subdivision (c), in consultation with CWDA and advocates for program applicants and recipients.

(2) Assistance pending shall mean the continuation of housing-related services and financial assistance, as described in the recipient’s housing plan that was in effect immediately prior to a proposed county action for reduction or discontinuance of assistance that gave rise to the complaint prior to the expiration of that housing plan.

(3) Financial assistance provided under this subdivision shall include recurring housing-related direct financial assistance provided to, or on behalf of, a recipient, including, but not limited to, rental assistance, utility payments, or other recurring payments consistent with program requirements and departmental guidance.

(4) Housing-related services that may be provided under this subdivision include, but are not limited to, housing navigation, credit repair support, ongoing housing education, case management, and legal services.

(5) The department shall establish criteria for collecting overpayments for financial assistance only, in the event that the county action reducing or discontinuing the financial assistance is determined correct pursuant to subdivision (b) or (c). The criteria, at a minimum, shall include both of the following provisions:

(A) There shall be no collection of overpayments for services rendered.

(B) The county shall waive overpayment collections when the collection will create an exceptional burden to the recipient, and for other good cause, as determined by further guidance issued by the
 department, in consultation with CWDA and advocates for applicants and recipients.

(e) The department shall issue guidance to counties to implement subdivisions (b), (c) and (d) no later than 18 months after the effective date of this section. The county shall then implement the guidance within six months of the department’s issuance of guidance. The right to file a request for an administrative hearing and the right to receive assistance pending shall become operative on the date the department notifies the Legislature that the department and counties have finalized the implementation of that guidance.

(f) Notwithstanding any other law, the processes described in subdivisions (b) and (c) shall be the sole administrative remedies available to any applicant for, or recipient of, the programs.

(g) Notwithstanding the
 rulemaking provisions of the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code), the department may implement and administer this section by means of all-county letters or similar written instructions from the department. These all-county letters or similar written instructions shall have the same force and effect as regulations.

(h) The department shall consult with CWDA, counties, and advocates for program applicants and recipients on the development of the processes described in subdivisions (b), (c) and (d).

(i) Subject to paragraph (5) of subdivision (c), funds appropriated for the programs shall be available to the department to administer this section. Funds appropriated for the programs shall also be available to counties participating in those programs to administer this section.

(j) “Program” or “Programs” means the programs described in paragraph (1) of subdivision (b).

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 107, Sec. 1.   (SB 146)   Effective September 17, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

10619.

A public agency shall, in implementing programs affected by the act adding this section to the Welfare and Institutions Code, perform program functions exclusively through the use of merit civil service employees of the public agency, except to the extent permitted by provisions of state and federal law governing the affected program that were in effect on August 21, 1996.

(History: Added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 270, Sec. 35.   Effective August 11, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998, by Sec. 183 of Ch. 270.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2.1. Public Social Services for Deaf Persons [10620. - 10629.]

10620.

The Legislature finds that over 1.5 million persons in California are deaf or are significantly hard of hearing. Basic governmental services are not routinely adapted to meet the communication needs of deaf and hard-of-hearing persons and, therefore, the services they receive may be less than those provided to other persons because of the overwhelming communication
 problems which exist between service agencies and deaf and hard-of-hearing persons.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 94, Sec. 29.   (AB 1709)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

10621.

Public social services for the deaf and hard of hearing shall include, but not be limited to, the following services:

(a) Complete communication services through interpreter services by a professional interpreter for the deaf possessing the comprehensive skills certification of the national Registry of Interpreters for the Deaf or the equivalent, teletypewriter relay, and, when necessary, training in communication skills.

(b) Advocacy to ensure deaf and hard-of-hearing persons receive equal access to public and private services.

(c) Job development and job placement.

(d) Information and
 referral.

(e) Counseling, including peer counseling.

(f) Independent living skills instruction.

(g) Community education about deafness and being hard of hearing.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 561, Sec. 279.   (AB 1516)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

10622.

Public social services for the deaf and hard of hearing shall be available in at least three regions throughout the state so that deaf and hard-of-hearing persons are able to secure public social
 services within a reasonable commuting distance. Deaf and
 hard-of-hearing persons, residing in urban, suburban, and rural areas, shall be served.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 94, Sec. 31.   (AB 1709)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

10623.

Public agencies or private nonprofit corporations or a combination thereof in a region may provide the public social services listed in Section 10621 directly or through agreements with other public agencies or private nonprofit corporations.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1193, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

10624.

(a) The department, with the advice of persons knowledgeable about the provision of public social services to deaf and hard-of-hearing persons, shall establish the criteria for funding public social services for the deaf and
 hard of hearing.

(b) The criteria shall include, but shall not be limited to, demonstrated need for services, ability to provide services in a deaf or hard-of-hearing person’s preferred mode of communication, ability to secure community support, including written endorsements of local officials and organizations, including organizations of and for the deaf and
 hard of hearing, and funding from one or more public or private sources. Special consideration shall be given to the extent to which deaf and hard-of-hearing persons are included in the agency’s staff and in the case of a private nonprofit corporation on the board of directors.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 94, Sec. 32.   (AB 1709)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

10625.

The department shall do all of the following:

(a) Determine the number and location of regions of the state providing public social services.

(b) Coordinate the provision of services with the Department of Rehabilitation.

(c) Establish uniform accounting procedures and contracts or grant agreements for use with regard to this chapter.

(d) Promulgate requests for proposals or applications
 and conduct bidders’ conferences, if applicable.

(e) Establish by regulation the definitions of deafness and significantly hard of hearing.

(f) Conduct a management or fiscal audit of any contract or grant whenever it is necessary for proper supervision of a contract or grant.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 43, Sec. 35.   (AB 120)   Effective July 10, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

10626.

(a) The department shall contract with, or award grants to, public agencies or private nonprofit corporations for purposes of this chapter. Those contracts or grants shall be competitively bid pursuant to a request for proposals or applications, either statewide or by specific region or regions. Each contract or grant shall have a term not to exceed five years. Before the end of each contract or grant term, the department shall conduct a timely competitive request for proposals or applications that allows sufficient time for execution of a subsequent contract or grant to avoid a lapse in services.

(b) Notwithstanding any other law, contracts necessary pursuant to this section shall be exempt from the personal services contracting requirements of Article 4 (commencing with Section 19130) of Chapter 5 of Part 2 of Division 5 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(c) A private nonprofit corporation shall submit a complete financial statement for its most recent fiscal year as prepared by a certified public accountant prior to a renewal or new award of a contract or grant.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 43, Sec. 36.   (AB 120)   Effective July 10, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

10626.5.

(a) A public agency or nonprofit corporation, or a combination thereof, providing the public social services listed in Section 10621, may charge a fee to all public and private agencies when providing public social services to those agencies. The charge shall be based on a standard schedule of fees established and maintained by the service provider. The amount charged shall equal the sum of all costs, direct and indirect, for providing the public social services listed in Section 10621. This fee shall be referred to as program income.

(b) The purpose of program income shall be for either (1) expanding, or (2) continuing the provision of public social services as listed in Section 10621, irrespective of the state fiscal
 year in which the program income was earned or collected. In the event of cancellation or nonrenewal of a contract or grant, all program income not expended shall be remitted to the department.

(c) Except as otherwise provided by law, all program income received shall be accounted for to the State Department of Social Services at the close of each fiscal year, or more frequently if required by the State Department of Social Services, or the Department of Finance, in such form as prescribed. It is the intent of the Legislature to allow prior collected funds currently in the possession of the service providers to be expended on the provision of the public social services as listed in Section 10621.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 43, Sec. 37.   (AB 120)   Effective July 10, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

10629.

The State Department of Social Services shall not expend over 5 percent of the sum appropriated for this chapter for the administrative costs of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1193, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2.5. Rehabilitation and Employment Coordination [10650. - 10656.]

10650.

It is hereby declared that the solution and prevention of individuals and families who could otherwise be productive and self-supporting members of society from becoming or remaining public assistance recipients is a matter of statewide concern. The Secretary of the Health and Welfare Agency shall have full power to direct, supervise, and coordinate all services provided by the state departments of the Health and Welfare Agency which relate to this matter, as necessary to achieve the purposes of this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1973, Ch. 1212.)
-------------------------------------------

10651.

The purposes of this chapter are as follows:

(a) To combat poverty and reduce dependency by placing special attention and emphasis on the training, rehabilitation, and employment of present and potential recipients of public assistance and to prevent their future unemployment;

(b) To combine and coordinate all state services and programs relating to vocational education, vocational rehabilitation, and employment for public assistance recipients;

(c) To avoid duplication and fragmentation of training, rehabilitation, and employment services, and provide the most effective services possible, on behalf of public assistance recipients.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 1457.)
-------------------------------------------

10652.

The department and the State Department of Rehabilitation, acting jointly, shall select public assistance recipients who qualify under either federal or state vocational rehabilitation laws, or both, as being in need of, and being able to benefit from, rehabilitation services pursuant to this chapter.

The two departments shall enter into a statewide agreement for the purpose of implementing the provisions of this section.

Any agreement entered into by the two departments pursuant to this section shall include plans which provide for the most effective use of all federal funds available to the two departments. Such plans may include budgetary transfers, subject to authorization of the Director of Finance, when such transfer will result in increased funds available for vocational rehabilitation services for public assistance recipients, and for former and potential recipients.

All increased funds made available as a result of the implementation of agreements and plans made pursuant to this section, shall be used exclusively to provide vocational rehabilitation service for current, former, or potential public assistance recipients.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1252.)
-------------------------------------------

10653.

The county department shall be responsible for the initial selection of public assistance recipients who are to participate in training, vocational educational programs, or other employment preparation programs that are developed pursuant to the provisions of this chapter. The county department shall have primary responsibility for providing those services which will prepare recipients for the specific vocational training and employment placement services offered by the Employment Development Department, the Department of Rehabilitation, the Department of Education, and any other state or federal agencies offering specialized programs to upgrade the capacity of recipients and potential recipients to improve their capacity for self-support or self-direction. The services provided by the county department shall be geared to complement those services offered by state and federal agencies to the end that recipients of public assistance receive and participate in the programs to the fullest extent of their capacity.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1981, Ch. 714, Sec. 473.)
-------------------------------------------

10654.

The Division of Vocational Education of the State Department of Education shall have primary responsibility for the education and training of public assistance recipients. The Secretary of the Health and Welfare Agency shall through the Employment Development Department work with the State Department of Education to develop vocational education programs which will meet the particular requirements and needs of recipients of public assistance whenever it is determined that such special programs will substantially improve such recipients’ capacity to achieve self-support or self-direction. The Employment Development Department shall determine the kinds, quality, and number of persons requiring such education.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1978, Ch. 380.)
-------------------------------------------

10655.

The Employment Development Department shall have primary responsibility for placement and other employment services for public assistance recipients; provided, however, that a county department may refer a public assistance recipient to a private employment agency at the same time the recipient is referred to the Employment Development Department. For the purposes of this section, a county department is authorized to enter into contracts with any private employment agencies under such terms and conditions and for such rates as the county department deems reasonable; provided, that once a public assistance recipient has been placed in employment by such an agency, a county department may not contract again with a private employment agency for placement of that recipient within six months of the original date of placement.

No referral or contract authorized under this section shall result in the recipient’s paying any fee, part of wages or other charges to the county department or private employment agency for such services.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1978, Ch. 380.)
-------------------------------------------

10656.

The provisions of this chapter shall be implemented to the full extent of funds available for such purposes.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 1457.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3.5. State Administration of Health Care Services and Medical Assistance [10720. - 10752.]



  ARTICLE 1. Organization [10720. - 10728.]

10720.

As used in this chapter, “department” means the State Department of Health Services, and “director” means the State Director of Health Services.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1252.)
-------------------------------------------

10721.

The director shall administer Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 14000) and Chapter 8 (commencing with Section 14200) of Part 3 of this division and any other law pertaining to the administration of health care services and medical assistance. He shall perform such other duties as may be prescribed by law and shall observe and report to the Secretary of Health and Welfare and the Governor on the condition of health care services and medical assistance throughout the state

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1252.)
-------------------------------------------

10722.

The State Department of Health Services succeeds to and is vested with the duties, purposes, responsibilities, and jurisdiction exercised by the State Department of Health or the State Department of Benefit Payments pursuant to Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 14000), Chapter 8 (commencing with Section 14200), Chapter 8.5 (commencing with Section 14500), and Chapter 8.7 (commencing with Section 14520) of this part on the date immediately prior to the date this section becomes operative. Functions transferred pursuant to this section include the management and administration of the Health Care Deposit Fund and the audit and recovery of amounts due as the result of payments made under the California Medical Assistance Program (Medi-Cal).

Transfer to the State Department of Health Services of the above functions shall not impair any contract between the State Department of Health or the State Department of Benefit Payments and any third party and such transfer shall neither create nor vest any right or obligation in either party. In no case shall the substitution of the State Department of Health Services for the State Department of Health or the State Department of Benefit Payments be considered a breach of contract or failure of performance, nor shall it disturb the legal relationships of the parties.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1978, Ch. 432.)
-------------------------------------------

10723.

The State Department of Health Services shall have possession and control of all records, papers, offices, equipment, supplies, moneys, funds, appropriations, land, and other property real or personal held for the benefit or use of the Director of Health or the Director of Benefit Payments in the performance of his duties, powers, purposes, responsibilities, and jurisdiction that are vested in the State Department of Health Services by Section 10722.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1252.)
-------------------------------------------

10724.

All officers and employees of the Director of Health and the Director of Benefit Payments who on the operative date of this section are serving in the state civil service, other than as temporary employees, and engaged in the performance of a function vested in the State Department of Health Services by Section 10722 shall be transferred to the State Department of Health Services. The status, positions, and rights of such persons shall not be affected by the transfer and shall be retained by them as officers and employees of the State Department of Health Services pursuant to the State Civil Service Act, except as to positions exempt from civil service.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1252.)
-------------------------------------------

10725.

The director may adopt regulations, orders, or standards of general application to implement, interpret, or make specific the law enforced by the department, and those regulations, orders, and standards shall be adopted, amended, or repealed by the director only in accordance with Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code. Regulations relating to services need not be printed in the California Code of Regulations or the California Regulatory Notice Register if they are included in the publications of the department. This authority also may be exercised by the director’s designee.

In adopting regulations the
 director shall strive for clarity of
 language that may be readily understood by those administering services or subject to those regulations.

The rules of the department need not specify or include the detail of forms, reports, or records, but shall include the essential authority by which any person, agency, organization, association, or institution subject to the supervision or investigation of the department is required to use, submit, or maintain those forms, reports, or records.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 442, Sec. 21.   (SB 1465)   Effective September 18, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

10726.

All regulations heretofore adopted by the Director of the State Department of Benefit Payments which relate to payment, accounting, auditing and collection functions vested in the State Department of Health Services, or by the State Department of Health or any predecessor department which relate to health care services or medical assistance functions vested in the State Department of Health Services, and which are in effect immediately preceding the operative date of this section, shall remain in effect and shall be fully enforceable unless and until readopted, amended or repealed by the State Director of Health Services.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1978, Ch. 429.)
-------------------------------------------

10727.

Except as otherwise provided by law, for purposes of the Health and Safety Code and this code, and any regulations adopted thereunder, after June 1, 1996, “children’s hospital” means any of the following hospitals:

(a) Valley Children’s Hospital, Madera.

(b) Miller Children’s Hospital, Long Beach.

(c) Childrens Hospital Los Angeles, Los Angeles.

(d) Children’s Hospital Medical Center of Northern California, Oakland.

(e) Children’s Hospital of Orange County.

(f) Lucile Salter Packard Children’s Hospital at Stanford, Palo Alto.

(g) Children’s Hospital and Health Center, San Diego.

(h) Loma Linda University Children’s Hospital, Loma Linda.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 290, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

10728.

(a) Except as otherwise provided by law, for purposes of this code and the Health and Safety Code, and any regulations adopted thereunder, “University of California children’s hospital” means each of the University of California children’s programs within the five University of California academic medical center campuses.

(b) This section is not intended to preclude participation by other entities in funding that would benefit children’s health care programs.

(c) For purposes of this section, the term “children’s hospital” may be used for signage, marketing, community service, and other university communication and philanthropic purposes only.

(d) Nothing in this section shall affect eligibility for any existing state funded health care programs.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 290, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Powers and Duties [10740. - 10752.]

10740.

It is hereby declared that provision for health care services and medical assistance in this code is a matter of statewide concern. The State Department of Health Services is hereby designated as the single state agency with full power to supervise every phase of the administration of health care services and medical assistance for which grants-in-aid are received from the United States government or made by the state in order to secure full compliance with the applicable provisions of state and federal laws.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 745, Sec. 240.   Effective October 12, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

10741.

The department shall investigate, examine and make reports upon the public officers who are in any way responsible for the administration of public funds used for health care services and medical assistance.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1252.)
-------------------------------------------

10742.

The department shall advise public officers regarding the administration of health care services and medical assistance by public agencies throughout the state, and shall supervise the administration of such services and assistance to all persons receiving or eligible to receive such services and assistance.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1252.)
-------------------------------------------

10743.

In administering any funds appropriated or made available to the department for disbursement through the counties for welfare purposes, the department shall establish regulations, not in conflict with the law fixing statewide standards for the administration of all state or federally assisted health care services or medical assistance programs. All regulations established by the department shall be binding upon the boards of supervisors and the county department.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1978, Ch. 429.)
-------------------------------------------

10743.5.

It is the intent of the Legislature that, if the department seeks a waiver for any experimental, pilot, or demonstration project in the 1995–96 fiscal year pursuant to the authority of Section 1315 of Title 42 of the United States Code that has as one of its objectives the obtaining of additional federal funds for health care services, the department shall notify all counties of its intent to seek a waiver. A county shall notify the department within three working days of its intent to participate in this waiver. The department shall include these counties if the necessary documentation required of the counties supports their inclusion in the waiver request. It is further the intent of the Legislature that the department seek to include as many counties as possible in this request.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 305, Sec. 9.   Effective August 3, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

10744.

If the director considers a county director to be failing, in a substantial manner, to comply with any provision of this code or any regulation pertaining to the administration of health care services and medical assistance, he shall put the county director on written notice to that effect, and shall give a copy of the notice to the board of supervisors.

If within 60 days the county director fails to give reasonable assurance that he is complying and will continue to comply with the laws and regulations, the director shall order the county to appear at a hearing, before him to show cause why he should not take action to secure compliance. The county shall be given at least 30 days notice of such hearing. The director shall consider the case on the record established at the hearing and, within 30 days, shall render proposed findings and a proposed decision on the issues. The proposed findings and decisions shall be submitted to the county, and the county shall have an opportunity to appear within 10 days at such time and place as may be fixed by the director for the purpose of presenting oral arguments respecting the proposed findings and decision. Thereupon, the director shall make his final findings and decision.

If the director determines that there is a failure on the part of the county to comply with the provisions of this code or the established regulations, or if the State Personnel Board certifies to the director that a county is not in conformity with established merit system standards under Part 2.5 (commencing with Section 19800) of Division 5 of Title 2 of the Government Code, and that administrative sanctions are necessary to secure compliance, the director may invoke any of the following sanctions:

(a) Withhold part or all of state and federal funds from such county until the county shall make a showing to the director of compliance; or

(b) Assume, temporarily, direct responsibility for the administration of any or all state-aided health care services and medical assistance programs in such county until the county shall provide reasonable assurance to the director of its intention and ability to comply with such laws and regulations. During such period of state administrative responsibility for county programs, the director or his authorized representative shall have all of the powers and responsibilities of the county director, with the exception that he shall not be subject to the authority of the board of supervisors; or

(c) Bring an action in mandamus or such other action in court as may be appropriate to compel compliance. Any such action shall be entitled to a preference in setting a date for a hearing.

Nothing in this section shall be construed as relieving the board of supervisors of the responsibility to provide funds necessary for the continued services required by law.

Nothing contained in this section shall be construed as preventing a county from seeking judicial review of action taken by the director pursuant to this section under Section 1094.5 of the Code of Civil Procedure or, except in cases arising under Sections 10962 and 10963, from seeking injunctive relief when deemed appropriate.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1252.)
-------------------------------------------

10745.

The department shall cause to be published and made available for sale to the public, at the cost of publishing, all of its rules and regulations relating to:

(a) The government of the department.

(b) Any form of health care services or medical assistance for which state aid is granted to the counties or over the administration of which the department has supervision.

The department shall also provide at cost such subscription service as may be necessary to assure to purchasers of the printed rules and regulations with respect to services prompt receipt of all additions and amendments to the rules and regulations of the department.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1252.)
-------------------------------------------

10746.

When the department causes to be published for public distribution informational pamphlets and related materials relating to public assistance programs administered or supervised by the department, they shall be printed in English and may be printed separately in Spanish, or at the discretion of the department, in English and Spanish, in such numbers as the department may determine.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1252.)
-------------------------------------------

10747.

Copies of all laws relating to any form of public social service for which state aid is granted to counties, and over the administration of which the department has supervision, and of all bulletins and rules and regulations of the department, shall be made available to the public and for public inspection during regular office hours at each county office administering such aid and in each local or regional office of the department.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1252.)
-------------------------------------------

10748.

The department may act as the agent or representative of or cooperate with the federal government in any matters within the scope of the functions of the department under this division, for the administration of federal funds granted to this state or for any other purpose in furtherance of those functions.

Any contract or agreement entered into by the department with the federal government or any agency thereof for the expenditure of any funds in the exercise of any power granted to the department by this section shall be subject to approval by the State Department of Finance.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1252.)
-------------------------------------------

10749.

The department may join associations of social welfare agencies having as their purpose the interchanging or supplying of information relating to the technique of social welfare administration.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1252.)
-------------------------------------------

10750.

The functions of the department may include the administration and the supervision of the administration of health care services and medical assistance within this state as an agent of the federal government and acting as a service agency for the federal government in the field of health care services and medical assistance.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1252.)
-------------------------------------------

10751.

The department, with the cooperation of the State Department of Social Services and the Employment Development Department, shall develop a homemaker and home health aid training and employment program for recipients under the Aid to Families with Dependent Children Program for purposes of applying for any available federal funds.

The departments shall undertake the program development only if federal legislation making federal funds available is enacted, and upon receiving federal funds, the department shall carry out the program by establishing demonstration projects. The Employment Development Department shall develop and supervise the training part of the program.

(History: Added by Stats. 1979, Ch. 901.)
-------------------------------------------

10752.

The department shall, by March 1, 2017, in coordination with the Department of Finance, notify the Legislature of the fiscal impact on the Medi-Cal program resulting from, and the planned reimbursement methodology for emergency medical air transportation services after, the termination of penalty assessments pursuant to subdivision (f) of Section 76000.10 of the Government Code on January 1, 2020.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 718, Sec. 2.   (AB 1410)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4. County Departments [10800. - 10813.1.]

10800.

Subject to the provisions of Section 11050 and Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 12000) of Part 3, the administration of public social services in each of the several counties of the state is hereby declared to be a county function and responsibility and therefore rests upon the boards of supervisors in the respective counties pursuant to the applicable laws, and in the case of public social services for which federal or state funds are provided, subject to the regulations of the department and the State Department of Health Services.

For the purpose of providing for and carrying out this function and responsibility, the board of supervisors of each county, or other agency as may be otherwise provided by county charter, shall establish a county department, unless otherwise provided by the county charter. Except as provided herein, the county department shall be the county agency for the administration of public social services and for the promotion of public understanding of the public social services provided under this code and the problems with which they deal.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1252.)
-------------------------------------------

10801.

A county director shall be appointed in each county by the board of supervisors or other agency designated by county charter, subject to either local merit system standards or to standards prescribed under the merit system required by state law.

The county director shall at all times be under the general direction and supervision of the board of supervisors, unless otherwise provided by county charter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 427, Sec. 117.   (AB 1062)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

10802.

The county director shall, for and in behalf of the board of supervisors, have full charge of the county department and the responsibility for administering and enforcing the provisions of this code pertaining to public social services under the regulations of the department and the State Department of Health Services. He shall abide by all lawful directives of the department and the State Department of Health Services, transmitted through the board of supervisors.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1252.)
-------------------------------------------

10803.

The county director shall:

(a) Serve as the executive and administrative officer of the county department. The county director may delegate his powers and functions to any member of his staff.

(b) Establish such administrative units as he may deem necessary or desirable for the proper and efficient administration of the county department, and employ such personnel as may be authorized subject to merit system regulations and the state standards established pursuant to Section 19801 of the Government Code. 

(c) Perform such other duties as may be prescribed by law, and, except for Section 10801, such other administrative and executive duties pertaining to the public social services as may, by other provisions of law, be imposed upon the board of supervisors.

(d) Perform such other duties as may be prescribed by the board of supervisors.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1969, Ch. 1283.)
-------------------------------------------

10804.
